Louisiana, session 2026, HB31.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:103(B)(1) and (E) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
11:62(6)(c), 157.1, 157.2, and Part IV of Chapter 8 of Subtitle III of Title 11 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 11:2243.1 through 2243.4, are hereby enacted
to read as follows:
Page 1 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-508 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 31
§62. Employee contribution rates established
Employee contributions to state and statewide public retirement systems shall
be paid at the following rates, except as otherwise provided by law:
* * *
(6) Municipal Police Employees' Retirement System:
* * *
(c) For members of the Death and Disability Subplan - 0%.
* * *
§103. Employer contributions; determination; statewide systems
* * *
B.(1) Except as provided in Subsection C and Paragraph (E)(2) of this
Section, for each fiscal year beginning with Fiscal Year 1989-1990, for each
statewide retirement system, the employer contribution rate shall equal the
actuarially required employer contribution as determined under Paragraph (3) of this
Subsection, divided by the total projected payroll of all active members of the
particular system for the fiscal year. Active member payroll shall include
participants in the Deferred Retirement Option Plan, but only if direct employer
contributions are made based on salaries for such participants.
* * *
E.(1) For the Municipal Police Employees' Retirement System, for the fiscal
year commencing July 1, 2014, all amortization credit and charge bases existing as
of June 30, 2014, shall be combined, offset, and reamortized over a twenty-year
period with level payments commencing July 1, 2014.
(2) For the Municipal Police Employees' Retirement System, beginning on
June 30, 2027, the employer contribution rate applied to payroll members of the
Death and Disability Subplan shall not exceed five percent and the cost of
administering the Death and Disability Subplan and shall be evaluated at least
annually, and the board of trustees in consultation with its actuary shall set a lower
rate. Beginning with the June 30, 2028, valuation and as part of the valuation
Page 2 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-508 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 31
process, the actuary shall determine and advise the board whether the experience of
the Death and Disability Subplan is sufficient to warrant adjusting the employer
contribution rate, but at no time shall the rate exceed five percent.
* * *
§157.1. Termination of employer participation in the Municipal Police Employees'
Retirement System
A. Notwithstanding R.S. 11:157, or any other provision of law to the
contrary, any municipality with a population between one thousand nine hundred
fifty and two thousand nine hundred fifty according to the latest federal decennial
census may, upon adoption of a termination resolution by the governing authority by
June 30, 2027, make an irrevocable election to terminate participation in the defined
benefit plan within the Municipal Police Employees' Retirement System. If a
municipality elects to terminate participation pursuant to this Subsection and does
not enroll its police officers in the Death and Disability Subplan, the municipality
shall provide death and disability coverage outside of the retirement system. The
municipality shall provide annual proof of death and disability coverage to the
Municipal Police Employees' Retirement System board of trustees. A municipality
that elects to terminate participation pursuant to this Subsection and does not enroll
its police officers in the Death and Disability Subplan shall be deemed to have fully
dissolved its police department in accordance with R.S. 11:2225.4.
B. A municipality that elects to terminate participation pursuant to
Subsection A of this Section shall provide the following:
(1) Written notification to the retirement system of the intent to terminate.
(2) Written notification of nonparticipation in the retirement system to any
new employee on or before the date of his hiring.
C. Beginning on the effective date of the termination resolution, the
municipality shall not enroll employees hired on or after the effective date of the
termination resolution in the Municipal Police Employees' Retirement System's
Page 3 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-508 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 31
defined benefit plan and employer and employee contributions shall not be paid to
the retirement system for such employees.
D. Any person who meets the definition of police officer on or before the
termination resolution effective date, shall remain a member of the retirement
system.
§157.2. Employer election to participate in subplan
An employer, as defined in R.S. 11:2213, that covers its police officers under
the federal Social Security program and which has not previously and specifically
excluded its police officers from coverage under this federal program may, by
adoption of an ordinance on or before June 30, 2027, make an irrevocable election
not to have its police officers subject to the provisions of R.S. 11:157 and to instead
have all of its police officers enroll in the Death and Disability Subplan as provided
in R.S. 11:2243.1 through 2243.4 or enrolled in the Hazardous Duty Subplan as
provided in R.S. 11:2241.1 through 2241.8.
* * *
PART IV. DEATH AND DISABILITY SUBPLAN
§2243.1. Death and Disability Subplan
A. The Death and Disability Subplan is created within the Municipal Police
Employees' Retirement System for eligible police officers of any employer that
covers the police officers under the federal Social Security program and which has
not previously and specifically excluded its police officers from coverage under this
federal program.
B. Any other provisions of this Chapter or any other laws to the contrary
notwithstanding, the benefits of the Death and Disability Subplan members shall be
governed by the provisions of this Part; however, if provisions of this Chapter cover
matters not specifically addressed by the provisions of this Part or if any of the
provisions of this Chapter are made applicable in this Part, then those provisions
shall apply to members governed by this Part.
Page 4 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-508 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 31
§2243.2. Application; definitions
Terms not specifically defined in this Section shall have the meanings
provided in R.S. 11:2213, unless a different meaning is clearly required by the
context. For the purposes of this Part:
(1) "Employer" or "Death and Disability Subplan employer" means either
of the following:
(a) An employer, as defined in R.S. 11:2213, that covers its police officers
under the federal Social Security program that has made an irrevocable election in
accordance with R.S. 11:157.2 to enroll all of its police officers who would
otherwise be eligible for membership in the applicable subplan provided for in Part
II of this Chapter in this subplan.
(b) An employer, as defined in R.S. 11:2213, that covers its police officers
under the federal Social Security program that employs a member who has made an
irrevocable election in accordance with R.S. 11:157 to be a member of this subplan
in lieu of membership in the applicable subplan provided for in Part II of this
Chapter.
(2) "Member" means any employee police officer of a Death and Disability
Subplan employer or any police officer who made an election under R.S. 11:157 to
be a member of this subplan.
(3) "Subplan" means the Death and Disability Subplan created by this Part.
(4) "System" means the Municipal Police Employees' Retirement System.
§2243.3. Disability retirement
A.(1) Eligibility for disability benefits, procedures for application for
disability benefits, procedures for the certification of continuing eligibility for
disability benefits, the authority of the board of trustees to modify disability benefits,
and procedures governing the restoration to active service of a police officer who
formerly had a disability shall be as provided in R.S. 11:202 through 225.
(2) The burden of proving that a disability is not based on a preexisting
condition, prohibiting receipt of benefits, shall lie with the police officer if the
Page 5 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-508 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 31
physical examination and waiver forms required by R.S. 11:2214(A)(2) have not
been submitted to the system.
B.(1) The board of trustees shall award disability benefits to eligible
members who have been officially certified as disabled to perform the position held
by the member at the time that the disability was incurred or as disabled to perform
any other position paying the same salary currently available in the department if the
disability is not the result of a preexisting condition. Upon receipt of any application
for disability retirement, the system shall request from the chief of police the job
descriptions of all positions currently available in the department paying the same
salary. Such job descriptions shall be submitted to the system within thirty days, or
it shall be presumed that no position is available that pays the same salary. The
disability benefit shall be determined as provided in this Section.
(2) Upon application for retirement due to a total and permanent disability
caused solely as the result of injuries sustained in the performance of his official
duties, a member shall receive a disability benefit equal to two and three-quarters
percent of his average final compensation multiplied by his years of creditable
service, but not less than thirty-three percent nor more than fifty-five percent of his
average final compensation.
C.(1) Any disability retiree who is in a coma or who is paraplegic, when
such condition is solely the result of injuries sustained in the performance of his
official duties and such condition is certified by the State Medical Disability Board
shall receive a benefit equal to his average final compensation.
(2) Any disability retiree who is blinded or who loses the total use of a limb
solely as a result of injuries sustained in the performance of his official duties and
whose condition is certified by the State Medical Disability Board shall receive a
benefit equal to his average final compensation.
D. Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 11:221(D), any disability benefits
granted under the provisions of this Section shall not be reduced because the
disability retiree is also receiving social security disability benefits.
Page 6 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-508 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 31
§2243.4. Survivor benefits
A. Benefits shall be payable to any survivor of a member of this subplan who
dies while in the service or a disability retiree who dies after retirement as a result
of injuries sustained in the line of duty as specified in this Section.
B. If an eligible member or disability retiree dies and leaves a surviving
spouse, the surviving spouse shall receive a benefit equal to one hundred percent of
the member's average final compensation less any survivor benefits payable to a
surviving child or children as provided in this Section. The sum of survivor benefits
paid to surviving children and a surviving spouse shall not exceed one hundred
percent of the member's average final compensation.
C.(1) If an eligible member or disability retiree dies and leaves, in addition
to a surviving spouse, one or more surviving children, each surviving child shall be
paid monthly benefits equal to ten percent of the deceased member's average final
compensation, or two hundred dollars per month, whichever is greater. However,
benefits payable on account of each surviving child, when added to the benefits
payable to the surviving spouse, shall not exceed an aggregate of one hundred
percent of the deceased member's average final compensation.
(2) If an eligible member or disability retiree dies and does not leave a
surviving spouse but leaves one or more surviving children, each surviving child
shall be paid a monthly benefit equal to twenty-five percent of the deceased
member's average final compensation. Benefits paid on account of each surviving
child shall not exceed an aggregate of fifty percent of the average final
compensation. If the deceased member is survived by only one surviving child, the
surviving child shall be paid not less than thirty percent of the deceased member's
average final compensation.
(3) If at the time of death the member or disability retiree is not married to
the natural parent of any surviving child or children who are entitled to receive a
payment pursuant to this Section and if a trust has been created by the deceased
member or disability retiree for the benefit of such surviving child or children, the
Page 7 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-508 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 31
payment shall be made to any person designated as a trustee by the member or
disability retiree on a certified copy of a trust document submitted to the system by
the member or disability retiree.